Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

This article was designated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020.

7-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Installment Loan Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, substituted “Georgia Installment Loan Act” for Georgia Industrial Loan Act”. See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-2.
Transfer to Department of Banking and Finance.

The powers, functions, and duties of the office of the Commissioner of Insurance relative to this chapter are transferred to the Department of Banking and Finance effective July 1, 2020. All action taken by the office of the Commissioner of Insurance prior to that date shall be considered valid, and the department shall, as of July 1, 2020, assume all ongoing and continuing obligations pursuant to this chapter. All personnel, supplies, records, materials, furniture, furnishings, books, equipment, motor vehicles, and services of the office of the Commissioner of Insurance utilized pursuant to the authority granted under this chapter shall be transferred to the department on July 1, 2020. Any action or investigation pending pursuant to this chapter shall remain in full force and effect and any powers relating to such action or investigation shall be transferred to the department on July 1, 2020.

All rules, orders, and actions adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to this chapter shall remain in full force and effect as rules, orders, and actions of the department unless amended, repealed, or superseded by rule, order, or action of the department.

All property, real and personal, funds, accounts receivable, contracts, liabilities, and obligations of the office of the Commissioner of Insurance for effectuating this chapter shall become the property, funds, accounts receivable, contracts, liabilities, and obligations of the department on July 1, 2020. Appropriations to the Commissioner of Insurance for functions transferred to the department pursuant to this Code section shall be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, rewrote the section, which read: “The purpose of this chapter is to authorize and provide regulation of the business of making loans of $3,000.00 or less and to bring within the regulation of this chapter and within its provisions all loans of $3,000.00 or less, whether or not made by a person organized or operating under the provisions and authority of some other statute, except those persons and loans expressly exempted by the terms of this chapter. Even though authorized by other statutes of force, such loans and the persons making them, unless expressly exempted, shall be within the operation of this chapter in accordance with its terms.” See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

7-3-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Control” or “controlling” means the direct or indirect possession of power to direct or cause the direction of management and policies of a person.

“Covered employee” means any employee of a licensee engaged in any function related to making installment loans or servicing installment loans made by others, excluding loans made by affiliated entities.

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Finance.

“Executive officer” means an individual who performs significant managerial, supervisory, or policy-making functions on behalf of a person, including, but not limited to, the vice presidents, chief executive officer, president, chief financial officer, chief operating officer, secretary, and treasurer.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Installment lender” or “lender” means any person that advertises, solicits, offers, or makes installment loans or services installment loans made by others, excluding loans made by affiliated entities.

“Installment loan” or “loan” means a contract or agreement to make a loan to an individual in an amount of $3,000.00 or less, including the renewal or refinancing of any such loan.

“License” means an authorization issued by the department or required to be obtained under this chapter to engage in the business of making installment loans.

“Licensee” means a person to whom a license under this chapter has been issued.

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” means a licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of certain persons engaged in nondepository activities.

“Owner” means a person that:

Owns, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more interest in a corporation or any other form of business organization;

Owns, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the voting shares of any corporation or any other form of business organization; or

Exerts control, directly or indirectly, over a corporation or any other form of business organization, regardless of whether such person owns or controls such interest through one or more individuals or one or more proxies, powers of attorney, nominees, corporations, associations, limited liability companies, partnerships, trusts, joint stock companies, other entities or devices, or any combination thereof.

“Person” means any individual, sole proprietorship, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, or any other group of individuals, however organized.

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 4; Ga. L. 1975, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 37/HB 891.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 20, 2020, deleted former paragraph (1), which read: “ ‘Commissioner’ means the Industrial Loan Commissioner”; added paragraphs (1) through (7); redesignated former paragraphs (2) and (3) as present paragraphs (8) and (9), respectively; in paragraph (8), substituted “an authorization” for “a single license”, inserted “by the department”, “to be obtained” and “to engage in the business of making installment loans”; in paragraph (9), substituted “a license” for “one or more licenses” and “has” for “have”; deleted former paragraph (4) which read: “ ‘Loan’ means any advance or money in an amount of $3,000.00 or less under a contract requiring repayment and any and all renewals or refinancing thereof or any part thereof”; added paragraphs (10) and (11); redesignated former paragraph (5) as present paragraph (12); in paragraph (12), substituted “any individual, sole proprietorship, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, or any other group of individuals, however organized” for “individual, copartnerships, associations, corporations, and all other legal and commercial entities”; and added paragraph (13). See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or servicing installment loans made by others, excluding loans made by affiliated entities” at the end of paragraph (2) and added “or services installment loans made by others, excluding loans made by affiliated entities” at the end of paragraph (6).

7-3-4.
Licensing requirement; exemptions.

No person shall engage in the business of making installment loans or acting as an installment lender in this state unless such person is licensed in accordance with this chapter or exempt from licensure as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. No person within the operation of this chapter shall charge, contract for, or receive directly or indirectly on or in connection with any loan, any interest, charge, fee, compensation, or consideration which is greater than the rates for same provided in this chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to:

Businesses chartered or licensed under the authority of any law of this state or of the United States as banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, savings banks, or credit unions or to the transactions of such businesses;

Banks or credit unions chartered under the authority of any state which have deposits that are federally insured or to the transactions of such businesses;

Pawnbrokers, as defined in Code Section 44-12-130, or to the transactions of pawnbrokers;

The University System of Georgia or its educational units, private colleges and universities in this state and associations thereof, or student loan transactions of such educational entities;

An individual employed by a licensee or any person exempted from the licensing requirements of this chapter when acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision of the licensee or exempted person as an employee and not as an independent contractor;

Any agency, division, or instrumentality of the federal government of the United States of America; the government of the State of Georgia or the government of any other state; or any county or municipal government in the State of Georgia; and the transactions of all such governmental entities;

Retail installment transactions engaged in by retail installment sellers, as those terms are defined in Code Section 10-1-31;

Retail installment transactions engaged in by retail sellers, as those terms are defined in Code Section 10-1-2; or

Transactions in which a lender offers a consumer a line of credit of more than $3,000.00 but the consumer utilizes $3,000.00 or less of such line of credit so long as there are no restrictions in place that would limit the consumer’s ability to utilize more than $3,000.00 of the line of credit at any one time.

History.

Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, § 18; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, § 19; Code 1933, §§ 25-221, 25-318; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 5; Code 1981, §

7-3-6

; Ga. L. 1985, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811; Code 1981, §

7-3-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 38/HB 891.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, redesignated former Code Section 7-3-6 as present Code Section 7-3-4, added subsection (a), and rewrote the former provisions now designated as subsection (b), which read: “This chapter shall not apply to businesses organized or operating under the authority of any law of this state or of the United States relating to banks, trust companies, real estate loan or mortgage companies, federal savings and loan associations, credit unions, and pawnbrokers or to the transactions of such businesses, which businesses are expressly excluded from regulation under this chapter and exempted from the operation of its provisions. This chapter also shall not apply to the University System of Georgia or its educational units, to private colleges and universities in this state and associations thereof, or to student loan transactions of such educational entities, which educational entities and student loan transactions thereof are expressly excluded from regulation under this chapter and exempted from the operation of its provisions. It is expressly provided that no bank, trust company, national bank, insurance company, or real estate loan or mortgage company authorized to do business in this state shall be required to obtain a license under this chapter nor shall the University System of Georgia or its educational units or private colleges and universities in this state and associations thereof be required to obtain a license under this chapter. It is further provided that persons making loans and charging interest thereon at a rate of not more than 8 percent simple interest per annum shall not be subject to this chapter or required to obtain a license under this chapter.” See Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter for applicability.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “or acting as an installment lender” in the first sentence in subsection (a); deleted “or” from the end of paragraph (b)(4), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (b)(5), and added paragraphs (b)(6) through (b)(9).

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 7-3-4, concerning the applicability of the chapter and its effect on existing lenders, was repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. SB 462, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020.
This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7.

7-3-5.
[Repealed] Applicability of chapter — Transactions by which money is paid others.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 331, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020.

7-3-6.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462 redesignated former Code Section 7-3-6 as present Code Section 7-3-4, effective June 30, 2020.

7-3-7 through 7-3-9.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 2/SB 462, effective June 30, 2020.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Sections 7-3-7 through 7-3-9, concerned the Industrial Loan Commissioner, licensing and the investigations of applications, and were based on Ga. L. 1904, p. 79, §§ 1, 2, 14; Ga. L. 1920, p. 215, §§ 2, 4; Code 1933, §§ 25-201, 25-202, 25-203, 25-301, 25-302, 25-304; Ga. L. 1955, p. 431, §§ 6 - 8; Ga. L. 1957, p. 331, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 55, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 370, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 288, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 479, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2725, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.